src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Kalderash morphophonological/twolc rules file 
!! =================================== !

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-rmy/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ä ö å
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý č ć ř š ś ž ź 

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Ä Ö Å
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Č Ć Ř Š Ś Ž Ź  

 %>:0 ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å 
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ;
 Cns = b c č ć d f g h j k l m n p q r ř s š ś t v w x z ž ;
 
Rules

"Deleting stem-final vowel before vowel-initial suffixes"
Vx:0 <=> Cns _ %>: Vow ;
     where Vx in ( ó o i ) ;

!!€ rakló>és
!!€ rakl00és

"l stem assimilation"
l:j <=> Vow _ %>: j ;

!!€ mol>já
!!€ moj0já

"i stem assimilation"
i:0 <=> _ %>: [í|i|j] ;

!!€ řomni>já
!!€ řomn00já

"oblique suffix assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> n %>: _ ;
      where Cx in ( k s t )
      	    Cy in ( g c d )
	    matched ;

!!€ phral>én>kê
!!€ phral0én0gê
